California statutes. Commercial Code
(a) The obligation of an indorser stated in subdivision (a) of Section 3415 and the obligation of a drawer stated in subdivision (d) of Section 3414 may not be enforced unless (1) the indorser or drawer is given notice of dishonor of the instrument complying with this section or (2) notice of dishonor is excused under subdivision (b) of Section 3504.

(b) Notice of dishonor may be given by any person; may be given by any commercially reasonable means, including an oral, written, or
 electronic communication; and is sufficient if it reasonably identifies the instrument and indicates that the instrument has been dishonored or has not been paid or accepted. Return of an instrument given to a bank for collection is sufficient notice of dishonor.

(c) Subject to subdivision (c) of Section 3504, with respect to an instrument taken for collection by a collecting bank, notice of dishonor shall be given (1) by the bank before midnight of the next banking day following the banking day on which the bank receives notice of dishonor of the instrument, or (2) by any other person within 30 days following the day on which the person receives notice of dishonor. With respect to any other instrument, notice of dishonor shall be given within 30 days following the day on which dishonor occurs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3504.

(a) Presentment for payment or acceptance of an instrument is excused if (1) the person entitled to present the instrument cannot with reasonable diligence make presentment, (2) the maker or acceptor has repudiated an obligation to pay the instrument or is dead or in insolvency proceedings, (3) by the terms of the instrument presentment is not necessary to enforce the obligation of indorsers or the drawer, (4) the drawer or indorser whose obligation is being enforced has waived presentment or otherwise has no reason to expect or right to
 require that the instrument be paid or accepted, or (5) the drawer instructed the drawee not to pay or accept the draft or the drawee was not obligated to the drawer to pay the draft.

(b) Notice of dishonor is excused if (1) by the terms of the instrument notice of dishonor is not necessary to enforce the obligation of a party to pay the instrument, or (2) the party whose obligation is being enforced waived notice of dishonor. A waiver of presentment is also a waiver of notice of dishonor.

(c) Delay in giving notice of dishonor is excused if the delay was caused by circumstances beyond the control of the person giving the notice and the person giving the notice exercised reasonable diligence after the cause of the delay ceased to operate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3505.

(a) The following are admissible as evidence and create a presumption of dishonor and of any notice of dishonor stated:

(1) A document regular in form as provided in subdivision (b) which purports to be a protest.

(2) A purported stamp or writing of the drawee, payor bank, or
 presenting bank on or accompanying the instrument stating that acceptance or payment has been refused unless reasons for the refusal are stated and the reasons are not consistent with dishonor.

(3) A book or record of the drawee, payor bank, or collecting bank, kept in the usual course of business that shows dishonor, even if there is no evidence of who made the entry.

(b) A protest is a certificate of dishonor made by a United States consul or vice consul, or a notary public during the course and scope of employment with a financial institution or other person authorized to administer oaths by the laws of any other state, government, or country in the place where dishonor occurs. It may be made upon information satisfactory to that person. The protest shall identify the instrument and certify either that presentment has been made or, if not made, the reason why it was not made,
 and that the instrument has been dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment. The protest may also certify that notice of dishonor has been given to some or all parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 269, Sec. 4.   (AB 75)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Discharge and Payment [3601. - 3605.]

3601.

(a) The obligation of a party to pay the instrument is discharged as stated in this division or by an act or agreement with the party which would discharge an obligation to pay money under a simple contract.

(b) Discharge of the obligation of a party is not effective against a person acquiring rights of a holder in due course of the instrument without notice of the discharge.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3602.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), an instrument is paid to the extent payment is made (1) by or on behalf of a party obliged to pay the instrument, and (2) to a person entitled to enforce the instrument. To the extent of the payment, the obligation of the party obliged to pay the instrument is discharged even though payment is made with knowledge of a claim to the instrument under Section 3306 by another person.

(b) The obligation of a party to pay the instrument is not discharged
 under subdivision (a) if either of the following applies:

(1) A claim to the instrument under Section 3306 is enforceable against the party receiving payment and (A) payment is made with knowledge by the payor that payment is prohibited by injunction or similar process of a court of competent jurisdiction, or (B) in the case of an instrument other than a cashier’s check, teller’s check, or certified check, the party making payment accepted, from the person having a claim to the instrument, indemnity against loss resulting from refusal to pay the person entitled to enforce the instrument.

(2) The person making payment knows that the instrument is a stolen instrument and pays a person it knows is in wrongful possession of the instrument.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3603.

(a) If tender of payment of an obligation to pay an instrument is made to a person entitled to enforce the instrument, the effect of tender is governed by principles of law applicable to tender of payment under a simple contract.

(b) If tender of payment of an obligation to pay an instrument is made to a person entitled to enforce the instrument and the tender is refused, there is discharge, to the extent of the amount of the tender, of the obligation of an indorser or
 accommodation party having a right of recourse with respect to the obligation to which the tender relates.

(c) If tender of payment of an amount due on an instrument is made to a person entitled to enforce the instrument, the obligation of the obligor to pay interest after the due date on the amount tendered is discharged. If presentment is required with respect to an instrument and the obligor is able and ready to pay on the due date at every place of payment stated in the instrument, the obligor is deemed to have made tender of payment on the due date to the person entitled to enforce the instrument.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3604.

(a) A person entitled to enforce an instrument, with or without consideration, may discharge the obligation of a party to pay the instrument (1) by an intentional voluntary act, such as surrender of the instrument to the party, destruction, mutilation, or cancellation of the instrument, cancellation or striking out of the party’s signature, or the addition of words to the instrument indicating discharge, or (2) by agreeing not to sue or otherwise renouncing rights against the party by a signed record. The obligation of a party to pay a check is not discharged solely by destruction of the check in connection with a process in which information is extracted from the check and an image of the check is made
 and, subsequently, the information and image are transmitted for payment.

(b) Cancellation or striking out of an indorsement pursuant to subdivision (a) does not affect the status and rights of a party derived from the indorsement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 14.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3605.

(a) In this section, the term “indorser” includes a drawer having the obligation described in subdivision (d) of Section 3414.

(b) Discharge, under Section 3604, of the obligation of a party to pay an instrument does not discharge the obligation of an indorser or accommodation party having a right of recourse against the discharged party.

(c) If a person entitled to enforce an instrument agrees, with or without
 consideration, to an extension of the due date of the obligation of a party to pay the instrument, the extension discharges an indorser or accommodation party having a right of recourse against the party whose obligation is extended to the extent the indorser or accommodation party proves that the extension caused loss to the indorser or accommodation party with respect to the right of recourse.

(d) If a person entitled to enforce an instrument agrees, with or without consideration, to a material modification of the obligation of a party other than an extension of the due date, the modification discharges the obligation of an indorser or accommodation party having a right of recourse against the person whose obligation is modified to the extent the modification causes loss to the indorser or accommodation party with respect to the right of recourse. The loss suffered by the indorser or accommodation party as a result of the modification is
 equal to the amount of the right of recourse unless the person enforcing the instrument proves that no loss was caused by the modification or that the loss caused by the modification was an amount less than the amount of the right of recourse.

(e) If the obligation of a party to pay an instrument is secured by an interest in collateral and a person entitled to enforce the instrument impairs the value of the interest in collateral, the obligation of an indorser or accommodation party having a right of recourse against the obligor is discharged to the extent of the impairment. The value of an interest in collateral is impaired to the extent (1) the value of the interest is reduced to an amount less than the amount of the right of recourse of the party asserting discharge, or (2) the reduction in value of the interest causes an increase in the amount by which the amount of the right of recourse exceeds the value of the interest. The burden of
 proving impairment is on the party asserting discharge.

(f) If the obligation of a party is secured by an interest in collateral not provided by an accommodation party and a person entitled to enforce the instrument impairs the value of the interest in collateral, the obligation of any party who is jointly and severally liable with respect to the secured obligation is discharged to the extent the impairment causes the party asserting discharge to pay more than that party would have been obliged to pay, taking into account rights of contribution, if impairment had not occurred. If the party asserting discharge is an accommodation party not entitled to discharge under subdivision (e), the party is deemed to have a right to contribution based on joint and several liability rather than a right to reimbursement. The burden of proving impairment is on the party asserting discharge.

(g) Under subdivision (e) or (f), impairing value of an interest in collateral includes (1) failure to obtain or maintain perfection or recordation of the interest in collateral, (2) release of collateral without substitution of collateral of equal value, (3) failure to perform a duty to preserve the value of collateral owed, under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) or other law, to a debtor or surety or other person secondarily liable, or (4) failure to comply with applicable law in disposing of collateral.

(h) An accommodation party is not discharged under subdivision (c), (d), or (e) unless the person entitled to enforce the instrument knows of the accommodation or has notice under subdivision (c) of Section 3419 that the instrument was signed for accommodation.

(i) A party is not discharged under this section if (1) the party asserting discharge consents to
 the event or conduct that is the basis of the discharge, or (2) the instrument or a separate agreement of the party provides for waiver of discharge under this section either specifically or by general language indicating that parties waive defenses based on suretyship or impairment of collateral.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. BANK DEPOSITS AND COLLECTIONS [4101. - 4504.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [4101. - 4111.]

4101.

This division may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code—Bank Deposits and Collections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4102.

(a) To the extent that items within this division are also within Divisions 3 (commencing with Section 3101) and 8 (commencing with Section 8101), they are subject to those divisions. If there is conflict, this division governs Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101), but Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) governs this division.

(b) The liability of a bank for action or nonaction with respect to an item handled by it for purposes of presentment, payment, or collection is
 governed by the law of the place where the bank is located. In the case of action or nonaction by or at a branch or separate office of a bank, its liability is governed by the law of the place where the branch or separate office is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.

(a) The effect of the provisions of this division may be varied by agreement, but the parties to the agreement cannot disclaim a bank’s responsibility for its lack of good faith or failure to exercise ordinary care or limit the measure of damages for the lack or failure. However, the parties may determine by agreement the standards by which the bank’s responsibility is to be measured if those standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

(b) Federal Reserve regulations and operating
 circulars, clearing house rules, and the like have the effect of agreements under subdivision (a), whether or not specifically assented to by all parties interested in items handled.

(c) Action or nonaction approved by this division or pursuant to Federal Reserve regulations or operating circulars is the exercise of ordinary care and, in the absence of special instructions, action or nonaction consistent with clearing house rules and the like or with a general banking usage not disapproved by this division, is prima facie the exercise of ordinary care.

(d) The specification or approval of certain procedures by this division is not disapproval of other procedures that may be reasonable under the circumstances.

(e) The measure of damages for failure to exercise ordinary care in handling an item is the amount of the
 item reduced by an amount that could not have been realized by the exercise of ordinary care. If there is also bad faith it includes any other damages the party suffered as a proximate consequence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.

(a) In this division unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) “Account” means any deposit or credit account with a bank, including a demand, time, savings, passbook, share draft, or like account, other than an account evidenced by a certificate of deposit.

(2) “Afternoon” means the period of a day between noon and midnight.

(3) “Banking day” means
 the part of a day on which a bank is open to the public for carrying on substantially all of its banking functions.

(4) “Clearinghouse” means an association of banks or other payors regularly clearing items.

(5) “Customer” means a person having an account with a bank or for whom a bank has agreed to collect items, including a bank that maintains an account at another bank.

(6) “Documentary draft” means a draft to be presented for acceptance or payment if specified documents, certificated securities (Section 8102) or instructions for uncertificated securities (Section 8102), or other certificates, statements, or the like are to be received by the drawee or other payor before acceptance or payment of the draft.

(7) “Draft” means a draft as defined in
 Section 3104 or an item, other than an instrument, that is an order.

(8) “Drawee” means a person ordered in a draft to make payment.

(9) “Item” means an instrument or a promise or order to pay money handled by a bank for collection or payment. The term does not include a payment order governed by Division 11 (commencing with Section 11101) or a credit or debit card slip.

(10) “Midnight deadline” with respect to a bank is midnight on its next banking day following the banking day on which it receives the relevant item or notice or from which the time for taking action commences to run, whichever is later.

(11) “Settle” means to pay in cash, by clearinghouse settlement, in a charge or credit or by remittance, or otherwise as agreed. A settlement may be
 either provisional or final.

(12) “Suspends payments” with respect to a bank means that it has been closed by order of the supervisory authorities, that a public officer has been appointed to take it over or that it ceases or refuses to make payments in the ordinary course of business.

(b) Other definitions applying to this division and the sections in which they appear are:“Agreement for electronic presentment”Section 4110“Bank”Section 4105“Collecting bank”Section 4105“Depositary bank”Section 4105“Intermediary bank”Section 4105“Payor bank”Section 4105“Presenting bank”Section 4105“Presentment notice”Section 4110(c) The following definitions in other divisions apply to
 this division:“Acceptance”Section 3409“Alteration”Section 3407“Cashier’s check”Section 3104“Certificate of deposit”Section 3104“Certified check”Section 3409“Check”Section 3104“Control”Section 7106“Holder in due course”Section 3302“Instrument”Section 3104“Notice of dishonor”Section 3503“Order”Section 3103“Ordinary care”Section 3103“Person entitled to enforce”Section 3301“Presentment”Section 3501“Promise”Section 3103“Prove”Section 3103“Teller’s check”Section 3104“Unauthorized signature”Section 3403(d) In addition, Division 1 (commencing with Section 1101) contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.

In this division:

(1) “Bank” means a person engaged in the business of banking, including a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or trust company.

(2) “Depositary bank” means the first bank to take an item even though it is also the payor bank, unless the item is presented for immediate payment over the counter.

(3) “Payor bank” means a bank that is the
 drawee of a draft.

(4) “Intermediary bank” means a bank to which an item is transferred in course of collection except the depositary or payor bank.

(5) “Collecting bank” means a bank handling an item for collection except the payor bank.

(6) “Presenting bank” means a bank presenting an item except a payor bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4106.

(a) If an item states that it is “payable through” a bank identified in the item, (1) the item designates the bank as a collecting bank and does not by itself authorize the bank to pay the item, and (2) the item may be presented for payment only by or through the bank.

(b) If an item states that it is “payable at” a bank identified in the item, (1) the item designates the bank as a collecting bank and does not by itself authorize the bank to pay the item, and (2) the item may be
 presented for payment only by or through the bank.

(c) If a draft names a nonbank drawee and it is unclear whether a bank named in the draft is a co-drawee or a collecting bank, the bank is a collecting bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.

A branch or separate office of a bank is a separate bank for the purpose of computing the time within which and determining the place at or to which action may be taken or notice or orders shall be given under this division and under Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4106 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4108.

(a) For the purpose of allowing time to process items, prove balances, and make the necessary entries on its books to determine its position for the day, a bank may fix an afternoon hour of 2 p.m. or later as a cutoff hour for the handling of money and items and the making of entries on its books.

(b) An item or deposit of money received on any day after a cutoff hour so fixed or after the close of the banking day may be treated as being received at the opening of
 the next banking day.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4107 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4109.

(a) Unless otherwise instructed, a collecting bank in a good faith effort to secure payment of a specific item drawn on a payor other than a bank, and with or without the approval of any person involved, may waive, modify, or extend time limits imposed or permitted by this code for a period not exceeding two additional banking days without discharge of drawers or indorsers or liability to its transferor or a prior party.

(b) Delay by a collecting bank or payor bank
 beyond time limits prescribed or permitted by this code or by instructions is excused if (1) the delay is caused by interruption of communication or computer facilities, suspension of payments by another bank, war, emergency conditions, failure of equipment, or other circumstances beyond the control of the bank, and (2) the bank exercises such diligence as the circumstances require.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4108 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4110.

(a) “Agreement for electronic presentment” means an agreement, clearing house rule, or Federal Reserve regulation or operating circular, providing that presentment of an item may be made by transmission of an image of an item or information describing the item (“presentment notice”) rather than delivery of the item itself. The agreement may provide for procedures governing retention, presentment, payment, dishonor, and other matters concerning items subject to the agreement.

(b) Presentment of an item pursuant to an agreement for presentment is made when the presentment notice is received.

(c) If presentment is made by presentment notice, a reference to “item” or “check” in this division means the presentment notice unless the context otherwise indicates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4111.

An action to enforce an obligation, duty, or right arising under this division shall be commenced within three years after the cause of action accrues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Collection of Items: Depositary and Collecting Banks [4201. - 4216.]

4201.

(a) Unless a contrary intent clearly appears and before the time that a settlement given by a collecting bank for an item is or becomes final, the bank, with respect to the item, is an agent or subagent of the owner of the item and any settlement given for the item is provisional. This provision applies regardless of the form of indorsement or lack of indorsement and even though credit given for the item is subject to immediate withdrawal as of right or is in fact withdrawn; but the continuance of ownership of an item by its owner and any rights of the owner to proceeds of the item are subject to rights of a collecting bank, such as those resulting from outstanding advances on the item and rights of recoupment or setoff. If an item is handled by banks for purposes of presentment, payment, collection, or return, the relevant provisions of this division apply even though action of the parties clearly establishes that a particular bank has purchased the item and is the
 owner of it.

(b) After an item has been indorsed with the words “pay any bank” or the like, only a bank may acquire the rights of a holder until the item has been either of the following:

(1) Returned to the customer initiating collection.

(2) Specially indorsed by a bank to a person who is not a bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.

(a) A collecting bank shall exercise ordinary care in all of the following:

(1) Presenting an item or sending it for presentment.

(2) Sending notice of dishonor or nonpayment or returning an item other than a documentary draft to the bank’s transferor after learning that the item has not been paid or accepted, as the case may be.

(3) Settling for an item when the bank receives final settlement.

(4) Notifying its transferor of any loss or delay in transit within a reasonable time after discovery thereof.

(b) A collecting bank exercises ordinary care under subdivision (a) by taking proper action before its midnight deadline following receipt of an item, notice, or settlement. Taking proper action within a reasonably longer time may constitute the exercise of ordinary care, but the bank has the burden of establishing
 timeliness.

(c) Subject to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a bank is not liable for the insolvency, neglect, misconduct, mistake, or default of another bank or person or for loss or destruction of an item in the possession of others or in transit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4203.

Subject to Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101) concerning conversion of instruments (Section 3420) and restrictive indorsements (Section 3206), only a collecting bank’s transferor can give instructions that affect the bank or constitute notice to it, and a collecting bank is not liable to prior parties for any action taken pursuant to the instructions or in accordance with any agreement with its transferor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4204.

(a) A collecting bank shall send items by reasonably prompt method, taking into consideration relevant instructions, the nature of the item, the number of those items on hand, the cost of collection involved, and the method generally used by it or others to present those items.

(b) A collecting bank may send:

(1) An item directly to the payor bank.

(2) An item to a nonbank payor if authorized by its transferor.

(3) An item other than documentary drafts to a nonbank payor, if authorized by Federal Reserve regulation or operating circular, clearing house rule, or the like.

(c) Presentment may be made by a presenting bank at a place where the payor bank or other payor has requested that presentment be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4205.

If a customer delivers an item to a depositary bank for collection both of the following apply:

(a) The depositary bank becomes a holder of the item at the time it receives the item for collection if the customer at the time of delivery was a holder of the item, whether or not the customer indorses the item, and, if the bank satisfies the other requirements of Section 3302, it is a holder in due course.

(b) The depositary bank warrants to collecting banks, the payor bank or other payor, and the drawer that the amount of the item was paid to the customer or deposited to the customer’s account.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4206.

Any agreed method that identifies the transferor bank is sufficient for the item’s further transfer to another bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4207.

(a) A customer or collecting bank that transfers an item and receives a settlement or other consideration warrants to the transferee and to any subsequent collecting bank that all of the following are applicable:

(1) The warrantor is a person entitled to enforce the item.

(2) All signatures on the item are authentic and authorized.

(3) The item has not been altered.

(4) The item is not subject to a defense or claim in recoupment (subdivision (a) of Section 3305) of any party that can be asserted against the warrantor.

(5) The warrantor has no knowledge of any insolvency proceeding commenced with respect to the maker or acceptor or, in the case of an unaccepted draft, the drawer.

(6) If the item is a demand draft, creation of the item according to the terms on its face was authorized by the person
 identified as drawer.

(b) If an item is dishonored, a customer or collecting bank transferring the item and receiving settlement or other consideration is obliged to pay the amount due on the item (1) according to the terms of the item at the time it was transferred, or (2) if the transfer was of an incomplete item, according to its terms when completed as stated in Sections 3115 and 3407. The obligation of a transferor is owed to the transferee and to any subsequent collecting bank that takes the item in good faith. A transferor cannot disclaim its obligation under this subdivision by an indorsement stating that it is made “without recourse” or otherwise disclaiming liability.

(c) A person to whom the warranties under subdivision (a) are made and who took the item in good faith may recover from the warrantor as damages for breach of warranty an amount equal to the loss suffered as a result of the breach, but not more than the amount of the item plus
 expenses and loss of interest incurred as a result of the breach.

(d) The warranties stated in subdivision (a) cannot be disclaimed with respect to checks. Unless notice of a claim for breach of warranty is given to the warrantor within 30 days after the claimant has reason to know of the breach and the identity of the warrantor, the warrantor is discharged to the extent of any loss caused by the delay in giving notice of the claim.

(e) A cause of action for breach of warranty under this section accrues when the claimant has reason to know of the breach.

(f) If the warranty in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) is not given by a transferor or collecting bank under applicable conflict of law rules, then the warranty is not given to that transferor when that transferor is a transferee nor to any prior collecting bank of that transferee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 316, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4208.

(a) If an unaccepted draft is presented to the drawee for payment or acceptance and the drawee pays or accepts the draft, (i) the person obtaining payment or acceptance, at the time of presentment, and (ii) a previous transferor of the draft, at the time of transfer, warrant to the drawee that pays or accepts the draft in good faith that all of the following apply:

(1) The warrantor is, or was, at the time the warrantor transferred the draft, a person entitled to enforce the draft or authorized to obtain payment or acceptance of the draft on behalf of a person entitled to enforce the draft.

(2) The draft has not been altered.

(3) The warrantor has no knowledge that the signature of the purported drawer of the draft is unauthorized.

(4) If the draft is a demand draft, creation of the demand draft according to the terms on its face was authorized by the
 person identified as drawer.

(b) A drawee making payment may recover from a warrantor damages for breach of warranty equal to the amount paid by the drawee less the amount the drawee received or is entitled to receive from the drawer because of the payment. In addition, the drawee is entitled to compensation for expenses and loss of interest resulting from the breach. The right of the drawee to recover damages under this subdivision is not affected by any failure of the drawee to exercise ordinary care in making payment. If the drawee accepts the draft (1) breach of warranty is a defense to the obligation of the acceptor, and (2) if the acceptor makes payment with respect to the draft, the acceptor is entitled to recover from a warrantor for breach of warranty the amounts stated in this subdivision.

(c) If a drawee asserts a claim for breach of warranty under subdivision (a) based on an unauthorized indorsement of the draft or an alteration of the
 draft, the warrantor may defend by proving that the indorsement is effective under Section 3404 or 3405 or the drawer is precluded under Section 3406 or 4406 from asserting against the drawee the unauthorized indorsement or alteration.

(d) If (1) a dishonored draft is presented for payment to the drawer or an indorser or (2) any other item is presented for payment to a party obliged to pay the item, and the item is paid, the person obtaining payment and a prior transferor of the item warrant to the person making payment in good faith that the warrantor is, or was, at the time the warrantor transferred the item, a person entitled to enforce the item or authorized to obtain payment on behalf of a person entitled to enforce the item. The person making payment may recover from any warrantor for breach of warranty an amount equal to the amount paid plus expenses and loss of interest resulting from the breach.

(e) The warranties stated in subdivisions (a)
 and (d) cannot be disclaimed with respect to checks. Unless notice of a claim for breach of warranty is given to the warrantor within 30 days after the claimant has reason to know of the breach and the identity of the warrantor, the warrantor is discharged to the extent of any loss caused by the delay in giving notice of the claim.

(f) A cause of action for breach of warranty under this section accrues when the claimant has reason to know of the breach.

(g) A demand draft is a check, as provided in subdivision (f) of Section 3104.

(h) If the warranty in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) is not given by a transferor under applicable conflict of law rules, then the warranty is not given to that transferor when that transferor is a transferee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 316, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4209.

(a) A person who encodes information on or with respect to an item after issue warrants to any subsequent collecting bank and to the payor bank or other payor that the information is correctly encoded. If the customer of a depositary bank encodes, that bank also makes the warranty.

(b) A person who undertakes to retain an item pursuant to an agreement for electronic presentment warrants to any subsequent collecting bank and to the payor bank or other payor that retention and presentment of the item comply with the agreement. If a customer of a depositary bank undertakes to retain an item, that bank also makes this warranty.

(c) A person to whom warranties are made under this section and who took the item in good faith may recover from the warrantor as damages for breach of warranty an amount equal to the loss suffered as a result of the breach, plus expenses and loss of interest incurred as a result of the
 breach.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4210.

(a) A collecting bank has a security interest in an item and any accompanying documents or the proceeds of either:

(1) In case of an item deposited in an account to the extent to which credit given for the item has been withdrawn or applied.

(2) In case of an item for which it has given credit available for withdrawal as of right, to the extent of the credit given, whether or not the credit is drawn upon or there is a right of chargeback.

(3) If it makes an advance on or against the item.

(b) If credit given for several items received at one time or pursuant to a single agreement is withdrawn or applied in part, the security interest remains upon all the items, any accompanying documents or the proceeds of either. For the purpose of this
 section, credits first given are first withdrawn.

(c) Receipt by a collecting bank of a final settlement for an item is a realization on its security interest in the item, accompanying documents, and proceeds. So long as the bank does not receive final settlement for the item or give up possession of the item or possession or control of the accompanying documents for purposes other than collection, the security interest continues to that extent and is subject to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), but all of the following are applicable:

(1) No security agreement is necessary to make the security interest enforceable (subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 9203).

(2) No filing is required to perfect the security interest.

(3) The security interest has priority over conflicting perfected security interests in the item, accompanying documents, or
 proceeds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4211.

For purposes of determining its status as a holder in due course, a bank has given value to the extent it has a security interest in an item, if the bank otherwise complies with the requirements of Section 3302 on what constitutes a holder in due course.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4209 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4212.

(a) Unless otherwise instructed, a collecting bank may present an item not payable by, through, or at a bank by sending to the party to accept or pay a written notice that the bank holds the item for acceptance or payment. The notice shall be sent in time to be received on or before the day when presentment is due and the bank shall meet any requirement of the party to accept or pay under Section 3501 by the close of the bank’s next banking day after it knows of the requirement.
